Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-604
Rule 604. Interpreters.

An interpreter is subject to the provisions of these rules relating to qualification as an expert and the administration of an oath or affirmation that he will make a true translation.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 37.